test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_uazzud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - uážžuđ: # MLO checked
    uážžuđ+V+Inf: uážžuđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uážum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: uážuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uážžu
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: uážžoon
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: uážžuvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: uážžuv
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: uážžup
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: uážžuvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: uážžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ožžum
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ožžuh
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: uážui
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: uážžoim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: uážžoid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: uážžoin
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: uážuim
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: uážuid
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ožžuu
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: uážuččim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: uážuččih
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: uážuččij
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: uážuččáim
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: uážuččáid
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: uážuččáin
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: uážuččijm
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: uážuččijd
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: uážuččii
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: uážžoom
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: uážžooh
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: uážuš
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: uážužeen
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: uážušvettee
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: uážužává
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: uážužep
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: uážušvetteđ
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: uážužeh

    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: uážu
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: uážus
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: uážžoon
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: uážžoo
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: uážžus
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: uážžup
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: uážžuđ
    uážžuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: uážžus
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: uážu
    uážžuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: uážžum
    uážžuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: uážuččii
    uážžuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ožžuu
    uážžuđ+V+PrsPrc: uážžoo
    uážžuđ+V+PrfPrc: uážžum
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Nom: uážžum
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Ess: uážžumin
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Loc: uážžumist
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Ill: uážžumân
    uážžuđ+V+Actio+Com: uážudijn
#    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážuhennáá
#    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážuhinnáá
    uážžuđ+V+VAbess: uážuhánnáá
